California statutes. Education Code
 licensing period in which the person applies a pesticide at a schoolsite subject to this article. The training course may be applied to his or her professional continuing education requirement required by the Structural Pest Control Board or the Department of Pesticide Regulation.

(2) The training course required by paragraph (1) shall be developed by the Department of Pesticide Regulation and may also be developed by a provider approved by the Structural Pest Control Board if the training course has been approved by the Department of Pesticide Regulation.

(3) The Department of Pesticide Regulation shall ensure that the training course it develops or approves pursuant to paragraph (2) meets the requirements for continuing education credit required by the Structural Pest Control Board and the Department of Pesticide Regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 848, Sec. 7.   (SB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Development Fees,Charges, and Dedications [17620. - 17626.]

17620.

(a) (1) The governing board of any school district is authorized to levy a fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement against any construction within the boundaries of the district, for the purpose of funding the construction or reconstruction of school facilities, subject to any limitations set forth in Chapter 4.9 (commencing with Section 65995) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code. This fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement may be applied to construction only as follows:

(A) To new commercial and industrial construction. The chargeable covered and enclosed space of commercial or industrial construction shall not be deemed to include the
 square footage of any structure existing on the site of that construction as of the date the first building permit is issued for any portion of that construction.

(B) To new residential construction.

(C) (i) Except as otherwise provided in clause (ii), to other residential construction, only if the resulting increase in assessable space exceeds 500 square feet. The calculation of the “resulting increase in assessable space” for this purpose shall reflect any decrease in assessable space in the same residential structure that also results from that construction. Where authorized under this paragraph, the fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement is applicable to the total resulting increase in assessable space.

(ii) This subparagraph does not authorize the imposition of a levy, charge,
 dedication, or other requirement against residential construction, regardless of the resulting increase in assessable space, if that construction qualifies for the exclusion set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 74.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(D) To location, installation, or occupancy of manufactured homes and mobilehomes, as defined in Section 17625.

(2) For purposes of this section, “construction” and “assessable space” have the same meanings as defined in Section 65995 of the Government Code.

(3) For purposes of this section and Section 65995 of the Government Code, “construction or reconstruction of school facilities” does not include any item of expenditure for any of the following:

(A) The regular maintenance or routine repair of school
 buildings and facilities.

(B) The inspection, sampling, analysis, encapsulation, or removal of asbestos-containing materials, except where incidental to school facilities construction or reconstruction for which the expenditure of fees or other consideration collected pursuant to this section is not prohibited.

(C) The purposes of deferred maintenance described in Section 17582.

(4) The appropriate city or county may be authorized, pursuant to contractual agreement with the governing board, to collect and otherwise administer, on behalf of the school district, any fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement levied under this subdivision. In the event of any
 agreement authorizing a city or county to collect that fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement in any area within the school district, the certification requirement set forth in subdivision (b) or (c), as appropriate, is deemed to be complied with as to any residential construction within that area upon receipt by that city or county of payment of the fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement imposed on that residential construction.

(5) Fees or other consideration collected pursuant to this section may be expended by a school district for the costs of performing any study or otherwise making the findings and determinations required under subdivisions (a), (b), and (d) of Section 66001 of the Government Code, or in preparing the school facilities needs analysis described in Section 65995.6 of the Government Code. In addition, an amount not to exceed, in any fiscal year, 3 percent of the fees collected in that fiscal year pursuant to
 this section may be retained by the school district, city, or county, as appropriate, for reimbursement of the administrative costs incurred by that entity in collecting the fees. When any city or county is entitled, under an agreement as described in paragraph (4), to compensation in excess of that amount, the payment of that excess compensation shall be made from other revenue sources available to the school district. For purposes of this paragraph, “fees collected in that fiscal year pursuant to this section” does not include any amount in addition to the amounts specified in paragraphs (1) and
 (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65995 of the Government Code.

(b) A city or county, whether general law or chartered, or the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development shall not issue a building permit for any construction absent certification by the appropriate school district that any fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement levied by the governing board of that school district has been complied with, or of the district’s determination that the fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement does not apply to the construction. The school district shall issue the certification immediately upon compliance with the fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement.

(c) If, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17621, the governing board specifies that the fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement levied under subdivision (a) is subject to the restriction set forth in
 subdivision (a) of Section 66007 of the Government Code, the restriction set forth in subdivision (b) of this section does not apply. In that event, however, a city or county, whether general law or chartered, shall not conduct a final inspection or issue a certificate of occupancy, whichever is later, for any residential construction absent certification by the appropriate school district of compliance by that residential construction with any fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement levied by the governing board of that school district pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) Neither subdivision (b) nor (c) shall apply to a city, county, or the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development as to any fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement as described in subdivision (a), or as to any increase in that fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement, except upon the receipt by that city, county, or the Office of Statewide Health Planning
 and Development of notification of the adoption of, or increase in, the fee or other requirement in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 17621.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.   (AB 2048)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17621.

(a) Any resolution adopting or increasing a fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement pursuant to Section 17620, for application to residential, commercial, or industrial development, shall be enacted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 66000) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code. The adoption, increase, or imposition of any fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement pursuant to Section 17620 shall not be subject to the California Environmental Quality Act, Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code. The adoption of, or increase in, the fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement shall be effective no sooner than 60 days following the final action on that adoption or increase,
 except as specified in subdivision (b).

(b) Without following the procedure otherwise required for adopting or increasing a fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement, the governing board of a school district may adopt an urgency measure as an interim authorization for a fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement, or increase in a fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement, where necessary to respond to a current and immediate threat to the public health, welfare, or safety. The interim authorization shall require a four-fifths vote of the governing board for adoption, and shall contain findings describing the current and immediate threat to the public health, welfare, or safety. The interim authorization shall have no force or effect on and after a date 30 days after its adoption. After notice and hearing in accordance with subdivision (a), the governing board, upon a four-fifths vote of the board, may extend the interim authority for
 an additional 30 days. Not more than two extensions may be granted.

(c) Upon adopting or increasing a fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), the school district shall transmit a copy of the resolution to each city and each county in which the district is situated, accompanied by all relevant supporting documentation and a map clearly indicating the boundaries of the area subject to the fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement. The school district governing board shall specify, pursuant to that notification, whether or not the collection of the fee or other charge is subject to the restriction set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 66007 of the Government Code.

(d) Any party on whom a
 fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement has been directly imposed pursuant to Section 17620 may protest the establishment or imposition of that fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement in accordance with Section 66020 of the Government Code, except that the procedures set forth in Section 66021 of the Government Code are deemed to apply, for this purpose, to commercial and industrial development, as well as to residential development.

(e) In the case of any commercial or industrial development, the following procedures shall also apply:

(1) The school district governing board shall, in the course of making the findings required under subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 66001 of the Government Code, do all of the following:

(A) Make the findings on either an individual project basis or on the basis of
 categories of commercial or industrial development. Those categories may include, but are not limited to, the following uses: office, retail, transportation, communications and utilities, light industrial, heavy industrial, research and development, and warehouse.

(B) Conduct a study to determine the impact of the increased number of employees anticipated to result from the commercial or industrial development upon the cost of providing school facilities within the district. For the purpose of making that determination, the study shall utilize employee generation estimates that are calculated on either an individual project or categorical basis, in accordance with subparagraph (A). Those employee generation estimates shall be based upon commercial and industrial factors within the district or upon, in whole or in part, the applicable employee generation estimates set forth in the January 1990 edition of “San Diego Traffic Generators,” a report
 of the San Diego Association of Governments.

(C) The governing board shall take into account the results of that study in making the findings described in this subdivision.

(2) In addition to any other requirement imposed by law, in the case of any development project against which a fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement is to be imposed pursuant to Section 53080 on the basis of a category of commercial or industrial development, as described in paragraph (1), the governing board shall provide a process that permits the party against whom the fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement is to be imposed the opportunity for a hearing to appeal that imposition. The grounds for that appeal include, but are not limited to, the inaccuracy of including the project within the category pursuant to which the fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement is to be imposed, or that
 the employee generation or pupil generation factors utilized under the applicable category are inaccurate as applied to the project. The party appealing the imposition of the fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement shall bear the burden of establishing that the fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement is improper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 541, Sec. 2.   (AB 2048)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17622.

(a) No fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement may be levied by any school district pursuant to Section 17620 upon any greenhouse or other space that is covered or enclosed for agricultural purposes, unless and until the district first complies with subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) The school district governing board shall make a finding, supported by substantial evidence, of both of the following:

(1) The amount of the proposed fees or other requirements and the location of the land, if any, to be dedicated, bear a reasonable relationship and are limited to the needs of the community for elementary or high school facilities caused by the development.

(2) The amount of the proposed fees or other requirements does not exceed the estimated reasonable cost of providing for the construction or reconstruction of the school facilities necessitated by the development projects from which the fees or other requirements are to be collected.

(c) In determining the amount of the fees or other requirements, if any, to be levied on the development of any structure as described in subdivision (a), the school district governing board shall consider the relationship between the proposed increase in the number of employees, if any, the size and specific use of the structure, and the cost of the construction. No fee, charge, dedication, or other form of requirement, as authorized under Section 17620, shall be applied to the development of any structure described in subdivision (a) where the governing board finds either that the number of employees is not increased as a result of that development, or that housing has been provided for those employees, to the extent of any increase, by their employer, against which housing a fee, charge, or dedication, or other form of requirement has been applied under Section 17620. In developing the finding described in this section, the governing board shall consult with the county agricultural commissioner or the county director of the cooperative extension service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17623.

In the event the fee authorized pursuant to Section 17620 is levied by two nonunified school districts having common territorial jurisdiction, in a total amount that exceeds the maximum fee authorized under Section 65995 of the Government Code, the fee revenue for the area of common jurisdiction shall be distributed in the following manner:

(a) The governing boards of the affected school districts shall enter into an agreement specifying the allocation of fee revenue and the duration of the agreement. A copy of that agreement shall be transmitted by each district to the State Allocation Board.

(b) In the event the affected school districts are unable to reach an agreement pursuant to subdivision (a), the districts shall jointly submit the dispute to a three-member arbitration panel composed of one representative chosen by each of the districts and one representative chosen jointly by both of the districts. The decision of the arbitration panel shall be final and binding upon both districts for a period of three years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17624.

(a) Any school district that has imposed or, subsequent to the operative date of this section, imposes, any fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement under Section 17620 against any development project that subsequently meets the description set forth in subdivision (b), shall repay or reconvey, as appropriate, that fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement to the person or persons from whom that fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement was collected, less the amount of the administrative costs incurred in collecting and repaying the fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement.

(b) This section applies to any development project for which the building permit, including any extensions, expires on or after January 1, 1990, without the commencement of construction, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 65995 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17624.5.

Any action brought in the superior court relating to this chapter may be subject to a mediation proceeding conducted pursuant to Chapter 9.3 (commencing with Section 66030) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 699, Sec. 2.   (SB 894)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17625.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any fee, charge, dedication, or other form of requirement levied by the governing board of a school district under Section 17620 may apply, as to any manufactured home or mobilehome, only pursuant to compliance with all of the following conditions:

(1) The fee, charge, dedication, or other form of requirement is applied to the initial location, installation, or occupancy of the manufactured home or mobilehome within the school district.

(2) The manufactured home or mobilehome is to be located, installed, or occupied on a space or site on which no other manufactured home or mobilehome was previously located, installed, or occupied.

(3) The manufactured home or mobilehome is to be located, installed, or occupied on a space in a mobilehome park, or on any site or in any development outside a mobilehome park, on which the construction of the pad or foundation system commenced after September 1, 1986.

(b) Compliance on the part of any manufactured home or mobilehome with any fee, charge, dedication, or other form of requirement, as described in subdivision (a), or certification by the appropriate school district of that compliance, shall be required as a condition of the following, as applicable:

(1) The close of escrow, if the manufactured home or mobilehome is to be located, installed, or occupied on a mobilehome park space, or on any site or in any development outside a mobilehome park, as described in subdivision (a), and the sale or transfer of the manufactured home or mobilehome is subject to escrow as provided in Section 18035 or 18035.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The approval of the manufactured home or mobilehome for occupancy pursuant to Section 18551 or 18613 of the Health and Safety Code, in the event that paragraph (1) does not apply.

(c) A fee or other requirement levied under Section 17620 shall not be applied to any of the following:

(1) Any manufactured home or mobilehome located, installed, or occupied on a space in a mobilehome park on or before September 1, 1986, or on any date thereafter, if construction on that space, pursuant to a building permit, commenced on or before September 1, 1986.

(2) Any manufactured home or mobilehome located, installed, or occupied on any site outside of a mobilehome park on or before September 1, 1986, or on any date thereafter if construction on that site pursuant to a building permit commenced on or before September 1, 1986.

(3) The replacement of, or addition to, a manufactured home or mobilehome located, installed, or occupied on a space in a mobilehome park, subsequent to the original location, installation, or occupancy of any manufactured home or mobilehome on that space.

(4) The replacement of a manufactured home or mobilehome that was destroyed or damaged by fire or any form of natural disaster.

(5) A manufactured home or mobilehome accessory structure, as defined in Section 18008.5 or 18213 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) The conversion of a rental mobilehome park to a subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or its conversion to any other form of resident ownership of the park, as described in Section 50561 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) If any fee or other requirement levied under Section 17620 is required as to any manufactured home or mobilehome that is subsequently replaced by a permanent residential structure constructed on the same lot, the amount of that fee or other requirement shall apply toward the payment of any fee or other requirement under Section 17620 applied to that permanent residential structure.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any school district that, on or after January 1, 1987, collected any fee, charge, dedication, or other form of requirement from any manufactured home, mobilehome, mobilehome park, or other development, shall immediately repay the fee, charge, dedication, or other form of requirement to the person or persons who made the payment to the extent the fee, charge, dedication, or other form of requirement collected would not have been authorized under subdivision (a). This subdivision shall not apply, however, to the extent that, pursuant to Section 16 of Article I of the California Constitution, it would impair the obligation of any contract entered into by any school district, on or before January 1, 1998.

(f) For purposes of this section, “manufactured home,” “mobilehome,” and “mobilehome park” have the meanings set forth in Sections 18007, 18008, and 18214, respectively, of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) (1) Whenever a manufactured home or a mobilehome owned by a person 55 years of age or older who is also a member of a lower income household as defined by Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code, and which has been moved from a mobilehome park space located in one school district, where the mobilehome owner has resided, to a space or lot located in a mobilehome park or a subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes or manufactured homes located in another school district, is subject to any fee or other requirement under Section 17620, this section, and Chapter 4.9 (commencing with Section 65995) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, the district in which the manufactured home or mobilehome has been newly located may waive the fee or other requirement under Section 53080, this section, and Chapter 4.9 (commencing with Section 65995) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, or otherwise shall be required to grant the homeowner the necessary approval for occupancy of the home, and permission to pay the amount of the fee or other requirement thereafter, in installments, over a period totaling no less than 36 months. A school district may require that the installments be paid monthly, quarterly, or every six months during the 36-month period, and that the fee be secured as a lien perfected against the mobilehome or manufactured home pursuant to Section 18080.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Costs of filing the lien and reasonable late charges or interest may be added to the amount of the lien. This subdivision does not apply if a school facilities fee, charge, or other requirement is imposed pursuant to Section 65995.2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 95.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17626.

(a) A fee, charge, dedication, or other requirement authorized under Section 17620, whether or not allowable under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 66010) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, may not be applied to the reconstruction of any residential, commercial, or industrial structure that is damaged or destroyed as a result of a disaster, except to the extent the square footage of the reconstructed structure exceeds the square footage of the structure that was damaged or destroyed. That square footage comparison shall be made, in the case of a commercial or industrial structure, on the basis of chargeable covered and enclosed space, as defined in Section 65995 of the Government Code, or, in the case of a residential structure, on the basis of assessable space, as defined in Section 65995 of the Government Code.

(b) The following definitions apply for the purposes of this section:

(1) “Disaster” means a fire, earthquake, landslide, mudslide, flood, tidal wave, or other unforeseen event that produces material damage or loss.

(2) “Reconstruction” means the construction of property that replaces, and is equivalent in kind to, the damaged or destroyed property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Energy Efficiency [17650. - 17653.]

17650.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the interest of the state and of the people thereof for the state to aid school districts in finding cost-effective methods of conserving energy in school buildings maintained by the districts. The Legislature also finds that while many districts may desire to participate in energy conservation programs designed to reduce the steadily rising costs of meeting the energy needs of school buildings, that the costs involved in improving existing school facilities to become more energy efficient are often prohibitive.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to encourage school districts to retrofit school buildings so as to conserve energy and reduce the costs of supplying energy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17651.

(a) School districts may borrow funds from federal or state regulated financial institutions for the purposes of design and construction costs associated with retrofitting school buildings to become more energy efficient. School districts shall only be authorized to borrow an amount which does not exceed that which can be repaid from energy cost avoidance savings accumulated from the improvement of school facilities.

(b) Any savings and loan association may make loans or advances of credit pursuant to subdivision (a) in an amount not in excess of 5 percent of its total assets. This investment may be in addition to any other investment savings and loan associations are permitted to undertake under Section 6705.7 of the Financial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17652.

To the extent that these services are available, school districts shall arrange for the preaudit and postaudit of school buildings by investor-owned or municipal utility companies or by independent energy audit companies or organizations which are recognized by federal or state regulated financial institutions. The preaudit shall identify the type and amount of work necessary to retrofit the buildings and shall include an estimate of projected energy savings. The postaudit shall be conducted upon completion of the retrofitting of the school buildings to ensure that the project satisfies the recommendations of the preaudit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17653.

School districts taking action under this chapter shall contract with qualified businesses capable of retrofitting school buildings. To the extent that lists of qualified businesses are made available to school districts by investor-owned or municipal utility companies or federal or state regulated financial institutions, school districts may utilize the services of these businesses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Heating, Ventilation, And Air Conditioning Systems [17660. - 17661.]

17660.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is the policy of the state that school facilities provide healthy indoor air quality, including adequate ventilation, to students, teachers, and other occupants in order to protect occupant health, reduce sick days, and improve student productivity and performance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 777, Sec. 2.   (AB 2232)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17661.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Covered school” means a school district, a county office of education, a charter school, a private school, the California Community Colleges, or the California State University.

(2) “HVAC” means heating, ventilation, and air conditioning.

(3) “MERV” means minimum efficiency reporting values.

(b) (1) A covered school shall,
 and the University of California is requested to, ensure that facilities, including, but not limited to, classrooms for students, have HVAC systems that meet the minimum ventilation rate requirements set forth in Table 120.1-A of Part 6 (commencing with Section 100.0) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, unless the existing HVAC system is not capable of safely and efficiently providing the minimum ventilation rate.

(2) If a school’s existing HVAC system is not capable of safely and efficiently providing the minimum ventilation rate required pursuant to paragraph (1), then a covered school shall, and the University of California is requested to, ensure that its HVAC system meets the minimum ventilation rates in effect at the time the building permit for installation of that HVAC system was issued. In
 addition, the covered school shall, and the University of California is requested to, document the HVAC system’s inability to meet the current ventilation standards set forth in paragraph (1) in the annual HVAC inspection report required by Section 5142 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, which shall be available to the public upon request.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), a covered school shall, and the University of California is requested to, install filtration that achieves MERV levels of 13 or higher
 to the extent determined to be
 feasible and appropriate for the existing HVAC system, as determined by the school.

(2) If, pursuant to paragraph (1), it is determined that the existing HVAC system is not designed to achieve MERV levels of 13 or higher, a covered school shall, and the University of California is requested to, install filtration that achieves the highest MERV level that the school determines is feasible without significantly reducing the lifespan or performance of the
 existing HVAC system.

(d) Upon the next triennial update of the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), the California Building Standards Commission and the Division of the State Architect shall research, develop, and propose for adoption mandatory standards for carbon dioxide monitors in classrooms of a covered school and the University of California.

(e) This section shall apply to the University of California
 only to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by resolution, make it applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 777, Sec. 2.   (AB 2232)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Shade Structures and Other School Projects [17670. - 17672.]

17670.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In April 2022, California released “Protecting Californians from Extreme Heat: A State Action Plan to Build Community Resilience” which warned of the threats extreme heat poses to public health and safety, economic prosperity, and the natural environment and cautioned that extreme heat can be dangerous or even deadly to vulnerable populations, including children, without access to cooling or shade.

(b) A 2022 heat wave shattered all-time high temperature records in cities across California, fueled wildfires, and pushed the electrical grid to the brink of rolling
 blackouts.

(c) According to research by the United Nations Children’s Fund (UNICEF), virtually all two billion children on earth will be exposed to more frequent, longer lasting, and more severe heat waves by 2050.

(d) The federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention identifies extreme heat as the leading cause of weather-related deaths in the United States.

(e) Children, especially those that attend schools in urban areas built with heat-retaining materials and that are ill equipped to shelter students from extreme heat, are at heightened risk of suffering heat-related illnesses, poor health outcomes, and a reduction in their ability to learn, as excessive heat interrupts outdoor activity and exercise.

(f) Schoolyard shading mitigates the urban heat island effect and reduces ambient temperatures by at least 15 degrees, safeguarding children’s physical and mental health and promoting educational progress.

(g) The Legislature has recognized extreme heat as a serious and urgent threat and called on state agencies and departments to invest resources in increasing resilience to extreme heat.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   (SB 515)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17671.

(a) Projects solely for the installation of freestanding, open-sided shade structures included on the Division of the State Architect pre-checked designs list where the adjusted construction cost exceeds the valuation threshold for alterations or additions
 on a school district, county office of education, charter school, or community college campus shall have the cost of compliance for path of travel improvements required by Section 202.4 of Chapter 11B of Part 2 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations limited to 20 percent of the adjusted construction cost of the shade structure project.

(b) For purposes of this section, “adjusted
 construction cost” has the same meaning as in Section 202 of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   (SB 515)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17672.

(a) School projects approved by the Division of the State Architect on or before December 31, 2030, that improve community ecological health and climate resilience, or improve pupil well-being, learning, or pupil play, and that incorporate nature, including living trees, shrubs, and other plants, natural materials, and basic infrastructure, such as pathways and benches on school grounds to support pupil engagement in the space, where the adjusted construction cost exceeds the valuation threshold for alterations or additions on a school district,
 county office of education, or charter school shall have the cost of compliance for path of travel improvements required by Section 202.4 of Chapter 11B of Part 2 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations limited to 20 percent of the adjusted construction cost of the project.

(b) In order to qualify for the limit of 20 percent of the adjusted construction cost of the project, as specified in subdivision (a), every effort shall be made not to significantly reduce accessible space and the project shall meet the applicable accessibility requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) and the California Building Standards Code and be, at a minimum, a project described in any of paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive:

(1) A project
 to remove impervious pavement such as asphalt or concrete and to replace those surfaces with healthy soil, trees, native or climate-adapted plantings, vegetable gardens, or permeable surfaces such as mulch, engineered wood fiber, wood decking, decomposed granite, or pavers.

(2) A project to plant trees or create schoolyard forests in places that pupils can access during the schoolday, designed to shade and protect pupils from extreme heat and rising temperatures.

(3) A project to regenerate and support local ecological systems by planting biodiverse tree and plant species intended to decrease air and water pollution, nurture birds, and other beneficial wildlife, and improve local watersheds.

(4) A project to support
 outdoor education on school grounds, including native gardens, orchards, vegetable gardens, outdoor classrooms, and other nature-based outdoor learning spaces.

(5) A multibenefit child-friendly stormwater project on a school ground serving pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, designed to manage runoff from the school building. These projects may include permeable surfaces, rainwater
 harvesting, and vegetated swales.

(6) A project to protect and enhance existing natural features such as heritage trees, stream corridors, and other natural areas, and make them accessible to pupils during the schoolday by removing fences or adding pathways, decks, stairs, ramps, interpretive signage, and other features needed to improve physical and visual access to nature for learning and play.

(c) The following projects shall not be authorized to use the limit of 20 percent of the adjusted construction cost of the project, as specified in subdivision (a):

(1) Projects that do not include any live vegetation.

(2) Projects that include
 artificial turf; rubber surfaces, except for rubber ground surfaces that provide accessibility for pupils with disabilities; rubber tires; plastic; and other similar materials that get excessively hot or materials that contain chemicals that are toxic to pupils and the environment.

(3) Projects that use trees and other vegetation that are not climate adapted or that are invasive.

(4) Projects that include sports fields or sports courts.

(5) Projects that include the construction of a new building or the modernization of an existing building.

(d) The Division of the State Architect may adopt regulations to implement this section. If the Division of the State Architect adopts regulations pursuant to this section, school projects submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) on or after January 1, 2025, shall be subject to the adopted regulations.

(e) For purposes of this section, “adjusted construction cost” has the same meaning as in Section 202 of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1014, Sec. 2.   (SB 1091)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------


